Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 1 DRIVERS' LICENSES
42-2-107. Application for license or instruction permit - anatomical gifts - donations to Emily Keyes - John W. Buckner organ and tissue donation awareness fund - legislative declaration - rules - annual report - repeal.

To be acceptable, every application for an instruction permit or for a driver's or minor driver's license must be made upon forms furnished by the department and accompanied by the required fee. The department shall set the fee in accordance with section 42-2-114.5 (2). The department shall transfer the fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit it to the licensing services cash fund created in section 42-2-114.5 (1). Every applicant shall submit with the application proof of age or proof of identity, or both, as the department may require.
(1) (a) (I) To be acceptable, every application for an instruction permit or for a driver's or minor driver's license must be made upon forms furnished by the department and accompanied by the required fee. The department shall set the fee in accordance with section 42-2-114.5 (2). The department shall transfer the fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit it to the licensing services cash fund created in section 42-2-114.5 (1). Every applicant shall submit with the application proof of age or proof of identity, or both, as the department may require.

If an applicant is applying for an instruction permit or driver's or minor driver's license for the first time in Colorado and the applicant otherwise meets the requirements for such license or permit, the applicant shall receive a temporary license or instruction permit pursuant to section 42-2-106 (2) until the department verifies all facts relative to such applicant's right to receive an instruction permit or minor driver's or driver's license including the age, identity, and residency of the applicant.

An applicant who submits proof of age or proof of identity issued by an entity other than a state or the United States shall also submit such proof as the department may require that the applicant is lawfully present in the United States.

An applicant who submits, as proof of age or proof of identity, a driver's license or identification card issued by a state that issues drivers' licenses or identification cards to persons who are not lawfully present in the United States shall also submit such proof as the department may require that the applicant is lawfully present in the United States.

The department shall not issue a driver's or minor driver's license to a person who is not lawfully present in the United States.

The department may not issue a driver's or minor driver's license to any person who is not a resident of the state of Colorado. The department shall issue such a license only upon the furnishing of such evidence of residency as the department may require.

Every application shall state the full name, date of birth, sex, and residence address of the applicant; briefly describe the applicant; be signed by the applicant with such applicant's usual signature; have affixed thereon the applicant's fingerprint; and state whether the licensee has ever been licensed as a minor driver or driver and, if so, when and by what state or country and whether any such license has ever been denied, suspended, or revoked, the reasons therefor, and the date thereof. These statements shall be verified by the applicant's signature thereon.
(2) (a) (I) Every application shall state the full name, date of birth, sex, and residence address of the applicant; briefly describe the applicant; be signed by the applicant with such applicant's usual signature; have affixed thereon the applicant's fingerprint; and state whether the licensee has ever been licensed as a minor driver or driver and, if so, when and by what state or country and whether any such license has ever been denied, suspended, or revoked, the reasons therefor, and the date thereof. These statements shall be verified by the applicant's signature thereon.

The department shall issue a new driver's license to a person who has a gender different from the sex denoted on that person's driver's license when the department receives a new birth certificate issued pursuant to section 25-2-113.8 or when the department recieves:

A statement, in a form or format designated by the department, from the person, or from the person's parent if the person is a minor, or from the person's guardian or legal representative, signed under penalty of law, confirming the sex designation on the person's driver's license does not align with the person's gender identity; and

If the person is a minor under the age of eighteen, a statement, in a form or format designated by the department, signed under penalty of law, from a professional medical or mental health care provider licensed in good standing in Colorado or with an equivalent license in good standing from another jurisdiction, stating that the sex designation on the birth certificate does not align with the minor's gender identity. This subsection (2)(a)(II)(B) does not require a minor to undergo any specific surgery, treatment, clinical care, or behavioral health care.

The department may only amend a sex designation for an individual's driver's license one time upon the individual's request. Any further requests from the individual for additional sex designation changes require the submission of a court order indicating that the sex designation change is required.

In addition to the information required by subsection (2)(a)(I) of this section, every application shall include the opportunity for the applicant to self-identify his or her race or ethnicity. The race or ethnicity information that may be identified on the application shall not be printed on the driver's license but shall be maintained in the stored information as defined by section 42-2-114 (1)(b). That information must be accessible to a law enforcement officer through magnetic or electronic readers.

In addition to the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), an application shall state that:

The applicant understands that, as a resident of the state of Colorado, any motor vehicle owned by the applicant must be registered in Colorado pursuant to the laws of the state and the applicant may be subject to criminal penalties, civil penalties, cancellation or denial of the applicant's driver's license, and liability for any unpaid registration fees and specific ownership taxes if the applicant fails to comply with such registration requirements; and

The applicant agrees, within thirty days after the date the applicant became a resident, to register in Colorado any vehicle owned by the applicant.

The applicant shall verify the statements required by this paragraph (b) by the applicant's signature on the application.

(2.5) (a) Any male United States citizen or immigrant who applies for an instruction permit or a driver's license or a renewal of any such permit or license and who is at least eighteen years of age but less than twenty-six years of age shall be registered in compliance with the requirements of section 3 of the "Military Selective Service Act", 50 U.S.C. App. sec. 453, as amended.

The department shall forward in an electronic format the necessary personal information of the applicants identified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2.5) to the selective service system. The applicant's submission of an application shall serve as an indication that the applicant either has already registered with the selective service system or that he is authorizing the department to forward to the selective service system the necessary information for such registration. The department shall notify the applicant that his submission of an application constitutes consent to registration with the selective service system, if so required by federal law.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (3), an application for a driver's or minor driver's license shall include the applicant's social security number, which shall remain confidential and shall not be placed on the applicant's driver's or minor driver's license; except that such confidentiality shall not extend to the state child support enforcement agency, the department, or a court of competent jurisdiction when requesting information in the course of activities authorized under article 13 of title 26, C.R.S., or article 14 of title 14, C.R.S. If the applicant does not have a social security number, the applicant shall submit a sworn statement made under penalty of law, together with the application, stating that the applicant does not have a social security number.

If federal law is changed to prohibit the collection of social security numbers on driver's license applications, the department shall automatically stop its practice of including applicants' social security numbers on applications for driver's and minor driver's licenses as specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3).

A sworn statement that is made under penalty of perjury shall be sufficient evidence of the applicant's social security number required by this subsection (3) and shall authorize the department to issue a driver's or minor driver's license to the applicant. Nothing in this paragraph (c) shall be construed to prevent the department from cancelling, denying, recalling, or updating a driver's or minor driver's license if the department learns that the applicant has provided a false social security number.

(Deleted by amendment,

L. 2004, p. 1891

, § 4, effective August 4, 2004.)

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that the availability of human organs and tissue by voluntary designation of donors under the provisions of the "Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act", part 2 of article 19 of title 15, is critical for advancements in medical science to occur and for the successful use of various medical treatments to save and prolong lives.
(b) (I) (A) The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that the availability of human organs and tissue by voluntary designation of donors under the provisions of the "Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act", part 2 of article 19 of title 15, is critical for advancements in medical science to occur and for the successful use of various medical treatments to save and prolong lives.

The general assembly further finds, determines, and declares that state government should play a role in increasing the availability of human organs and tissue to procurement organizations, as defined in section

15-19-202

, by acting as a conduit to make money available for promoting organ and tissue donation and that this role constitutes a public purpose.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the Emily Keyes - John W. Buckner organ and tissue donation awareness fund, which shall consist of all moneys credited thereto from all sources including but not limited to moneys collected from voluntary contributions for organ and tissue donation pursuant to subparagraph (V) of this paragraph (b) and section

42-2-118 (1)(a)

(II). All moneys in the fund are hereby continuously appropriated to the department of the treasury and shall remain in the fund to be used for the purposes set forth in subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (b) and shall not revert to the general fund or any other fund. All interest derived from the deposit and investment of this fund shall be credited to the fund. At least quarterly, the state treasurer shall transfer all available moneys in the Emily Keyes - John W. Buckner organ and tissue donation awareness fund to Donor Alliance, Inc., or its successor organization, as directed by sub-subparagraph (A) of subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (b).

At least quarterly, the state treasurer shall transfer all available money from the Emily Keyes - John W. Buckner organ and tissue donation awareness fund:

To Donor Alliance, Inc., or its successor organization, to provide funding for activities to promote organ and tissue donation through the creation and dissemination, by means of electronic media and otherwise, of educational information including public service announcements and information to increase awareness in the medical professions and related fields. Donor Alliance, Inc., or its successor organization, shall create, by amendment to its articles of incorporation or bylaws or otherwise, as appropriate, an advisory group to allocate moneys received pursuant to this sub-subparagraph (A). Such advisory body shall include a representative of any qualified transplant organization. Such organizations shall include those for organs, tissue, and living donations. The advisory body created under this sub-subparagraph (A) shall report in writing in a form and manner determined by the department and at such intervals as required by the department on the use of moneys received under this sub-subparagraph (A). No moneys made available pursuant to this paragraph (b) shall be used to encourage fetal tissue donation.

(Deleted by amendment,

L. 98, p. 1172

, § 9, effective June 1, 1998.)

Before any payment to Donor Alliance, Inc., or its successor organization, from the Emily Keyes - John W. Buckner organ and tissue donation awareness fund may be made for any purpose, to the department for the reasonable costs associated with the initial installation of the organ and tissue donor registry, the setup for electronic transfer of the donor information for the organ and tissue donor registry to the federally designated organ procurement organization, and computer programming, reprogramming, and form changes necessary as a result of the creation or modification of the organ and tissue donor registry.

To Donor Alliance, Inc., or its successor organization, for the costs associated with educating the public about the organ and tissue donor registry pursuant to section

15-19-220

.

Appropriations made by the general assembly pursuant to subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (b) shall not exceed moneys in the Emily Keyes - John W. Buckner organ and tissue donation awareness fund that are available for appropriation.

An applicant may make a donation of one dollar or more to the Emily Keyes - John W. Buckner organ and tissue donation awareness fund, created in subsection (4)(b)(II) of this section, to promote the donation of organs and tissues under the "Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act", part 2 of article 19 of title 15. The department shall collect the financial donations and transmit them to the state treasurer, who shall credit them to the Emily Keyes - John W. Buckner organ and tissue donation awareness fund. The donation prescribed in this subsection (4)(b)(V) is voluntary and may be refused by the applicant. The department shall make available informational booklets or other informational sources on the importance of organ and tissue donations to applicants as designed and approved by the advisory body created under subsection (4)(b)(III)(A) of this section. The department shall inquire of each applicant at the time the completed application is presented whether the applicant is interested in making a donation of one dollar or more and shall also specifically inform the applicant of the option for organ and tissue donations. The department shall also provide written information designed and approved by the advisory body created under subsection (4)(b)(III)(A) of this section to each applicant volunteering to become an organ and tissue donor. The written information shall disclose that the applicant's name shall be transmitted to the organ and tissue donor registry authorized in section

15-19-220

, and that the applicant shall notify the federally designated organ procurement organization of any changes to the applicant's donor status. The issuance of an identification card, a driver's license, or an instruction permit with a donor's designation completes the donation process and is effective unless revoked pursuant to section

15-19-206

of the "Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act", part 2 of article 19 of title 15.

(V.5) Designation on a donor's driver's license or permit shall fulfill the release requirements set forth in section

24-72-204 (7)(b)

, C.R.S.

The provisions of article 16 of title 6, C.R.S., shall not apply to the activities of the department under this paragraph (b).

By October 1, 2017, and by each October 1 thereafter, Donor Alliance, Inc., or its successor organization, shall submit to the department an annual report detailing the amounts and specific uses of all funds received by Donor Alliance, Inc., from the Emily Keyes - John W. Buckner organ and tissue donation awareness fund.

This subsection (4)(b) is repealed, effective September 1, 2027.

Prior to the issuance of a driver's or minor driver's license, the department shall determine if there are any outstanding judgments or warrants entered or issued against the applicant pursuant to section 42-4-1709 (7).
(5) (a) (I) Prior to the issuance of a driver's or minor driver's license, the department shall determine if there are any outstanding judgments or warrants entered or issued against the applicant pursuant to section 42-4-1709 (7).

For the purposes of this subsection (5), "outstanding judgments or warrants" does not include any judgment or warrant reported to the department in violation of the provisions of section 42-4-110.5 (2)(c).

If the department determines that there are no outstanding judgments or warrants entered or issued against the applicant and if all other conditions for issuance required by articles 1 to 4 of this title are met, the department shall issue the license.

If the department determines that there are outstanding judgments or warrants entered or issued against the applicant and the applicant is subject to the provisions of section 42-4-1709 (7), the license shall not be issued until the applicant has complied with the requirements of that section. Any person who satisfies an outstanding judgment or warrant entered pursuant to section 42-4-1709 (7) shall pay to the court a thirty-dollar administrative processing fee for each such judgment or warrant in addition to all other penalties, costs, or forfeitures. The court shall remit fifty percent of the administrative processing fee to the department of revenue, and the other fifty percent shall be retained by the issuing court.

Notwithstanding the amount specified for any fee in this section, the executive director of the department by rule or as otherwise provided by law may reduce the amount of one or more of the fees if necessary pursuant to section 24-75-402 (3), C.R.S., to reduce the uncommitted reserves of the fund to which all or any portion of one or more of the fees is credited. After the uncommitted reserves of the fund are sufficiently reduced, the executive director of the department by rule or as otherwise provided by law may increase the amount of one or more of the fees as provided in section 24-75-402 (4), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2119, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(5) added, p. 1003, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

IP(15)(b) amended, p. 1201, § 1, effective June 1; (4) amended, p. 1132, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(5)(a) amended, p. 1669, § 2, effective June 5; (2) amended, p. 1000, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 98:

(4)(a), (4)(b)(II), (4)(b)(III)(B), and (4)(b)(VII) amended, p. 1172, § 9, effective June 1; (6) added, p. 1351, § 93, effective June 1; (1) amended, p. 294, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(4)(b)(II) amended, p. 630, § 46, effective August 4.

L. 2000:

(3) amended, p. 1715, § 11, effective July 1; (4)(b)(III)(C), (4)(b)(III)(D), and (4)(b)(V.5) added and (4)(b)(V) and (4)(b)(VII) amended, pp. 730, 731, 733, §§ 8, 9, 14, effective July 1; (1)(a), (1)(c), (1)(d), (2)(a), (3), and (5)(a)(I) amended, p. 1349, § 16, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2001:

(1)(a) amended, p. 938, § 2, effective July 1; (2.5) added, p. 646, § 1, effective August 8; (3)(a) amended and (3)(c) added, p. 782, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2002:

(1)(b) amended, p. 171, § 1, effective April 2.

L. 2004:

(4)(a), (4)(b)(II), (4)(b)(III)(C), and (4)(b)(V) amended, p. 1891, § 4, effective August 4.

L. 2005:

(3)(a) amended, p. 642, § 4, effective May 27.

L. 2007:

(4)(b)(II), IP(4)(b)(III), (4)(b)(III)(A), (4)(b)(III)(C), (4)(b)(III)(D), (4)(b)(IV), (4)(b)(V), and (4)(b)(VII) amended, p. 307, § 1, effective, March 30; (1)(a)(I) amended, p. 1570, § 2, effective July 1; (4)(b)(I), (4)(b)(III)(C), (4)(b)(III)(D), and (4)(b)(V) amended, p. 799, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1)(a)(I) amended, (SB 09-274), ch. 210, p. 951, § 1, effective May 1.

L. 2010:

(1)(a)(I) amended, (HB 10-1387), ch. 205, p. 886, § 1, effective May 5.

L. 2011:

(4)(b)(II) and (4)(b)(III) amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1177, § 99, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(1)(a)(I) amended, (HB 12-1216), ch. 80, p. 263, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(1)(c) amended, (SB 13-251), ch. 402, p. 2351, § 2, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

(1)(a)(I) amended, (SB 14-194), ch. 346, p. 1543, § 6, effective June 5.

L. 2016:

(2)(a) amended, (HB 16-1021), ch. 322, p. 1307, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2017:

(4)(b)(I)(A), (4)(b)(I)(B), IP(4)(b)(III), (4)(b)(III)(D), and (4)(b)(V) amended, (SB 17-223), ch. 158, p. 564, § 18, effective August 9; (4)(b)(II), IP(4)(b)(III), (4)(b)(III)(A), (4)(b)(III)(C), (4)(b)(IV), (4)(b)(V), and (4)(b)(VII) amended and (4)(b)(VIII) added, (HB 17-1027), ch. 329, p. 1759, § 1, effective September 15.

L. 2019:

(2)(a) amended, (HB 19-1039), ch. 377, p. 3405, § 3, effective January 1, 2020.

L. 2020:

(2)(a)(II) amended, (SB 20-166), ch. 280, p. 1371, § 2, effective July 13.

42-2-108. Application of minors.

The application of any person under eighteen years of age for an instruction permit or minor driver's license must be accompanied by either:
(1) (a) (I) The application of any person under eighteen years of age for an instruction permit or minor driver's license must be accompanied by either:

An affidavit of liability signed and verified by the parent, stepparent, foster parent, grandparent with power of attorney, guardian, spouse of the applicant if the spouse is eighteen years of age or older, or any other responsible adult who assumes the obligation imposed under this article 2 by signing the affidavit of liability for a minor; or

Proof of financial responsibility for the future, as defined in section 42-7-103 (14), held in the name of the minor if the minor is a foster child.

When an applicant has been made a ward of any court in the state for any reason and has been placed in foster care, the foster parents or parent may sign the affidavit of liability for the minor. If the parent or foster parent is unwilling or unable to sign the affidavit of liability, a guardian ad litem, an official of the county department of human or social services having custody of the applicant, or an official of the division of youth services in the state department of human services having custody of the applicant may sign the application for an instruction permit without signing the affidavit of liability for the minor if the requirements of subsection (1)(b) of this section are met; except that, prior to signing the application for an instruction permit, the guardian ad litem or other official shall notify the court of his or her intent to sign the application, and except that the guardian ad litem or official shall not sign the application for an instruction permit for a minor who is placed in foster care and is under seventeen years of age without first obtaining the consent of the foster parent. If the minor is seventeen years of age or older and is in the care of a foster parent, in order to prepare the minor for emancipation from foster care and to assist the minor in obtaining important life skills, the guardian ad litem or official shall consult with the foster parent of the minor about the opportunity for the minor to learn driving skills under the restrictions provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section prior to signing an application for an instruction permit. The guardian ad litem or official shall solicit the opinion of the minor's foster parent concerning the minor's ability to exercise good judgment and make decisions as well as the minor's overall capacity to drive.

When a minor to whom an instruction permit or minor driver's license has been issued is required to appear before the department for a hearing in accordance with this article 2, the person who signed the affidavit of liability for the minor or the guardian ad litem or official who signed the application for an instruction permit for the minor shall accompany the minor. If the person who signed the minor's affidavit of liability or application for an instruction permit is unable to attend the hearing, he or she shall submit to the department a verified signed statement certifying under oath that he or she is aware of the purpose of the hearing but cannot attend.

The department shall issue an instruction permit to an applicant under eighteen years of age who is otherwise eligible to obtain an instruction permit and who has been made a ward of the court and who is in out-of-home placement without the requirement of a person signing an affidavit of liability if the following requirements are met:

The guardian ad litem, an official of the county department of human or social services having custody of the applicant, or an official of the division of youth services in the state department of human services having custody of the applicant signs the application for an instruction permit; and

If the minor is in the care of a foster parent and is under seventeen years of age, the foster parent consents to the minor learning driving skills under the restrictions provided in this subsection (1); or

If the minor is in the care of a foster parent and is at least seventeen years of age, the guardian ad litem or the official has consulted with the foster parent prior to signing the application for an instruction permit.

and (IV) Repealed.

(1.5) (a) The application of any person under the age of eighteen years for an instruction permit or minor driver's license shall include the option for a minor to be an organ or tissue donor.

Repealed.

Any person under the age of eighteen years who volunteers to donate anatomical gifts by designation on an instructional permit or minor driver's license shall include a notice of consent signed and verified by the father or the mother of the applicant, or, in the event neither parent is living, by the person or guardian having proof of legal custody of such minor, or by the spouse of the applicant if the spouse of the applicant is eighteen years of age or older.

If the person under the age of eighteen years who volunteers to donate anatomical gifts by designation on an instructional permit or minor driver's license is an emancipated minor, a notice of consent is not necessary for an anatomical gift to be valid.

Each county department of human or social services having custody of a foster child or ward of the court may implement a program that provides the services authorized under subsection (1)(b) of this section. The county department of human or social services may:

Assess the child's or ward's mental, emotional, and physical ability to safely drive a motor vehicle and, based on that assessment, approve or deny the provision of services under subsection (1)(b) of this section; and

Seek, accept, and expend gifts, grants, or donations from private or public sources for the purposes of this subsection (1.5).

Any negligence or willful misconduct of a minor under the age of eighteen years who drives a motor vehicle upon a highway is imputed to the person who signed the affidavit of liability which accompanied the application of such minor for a permit or license. Such person is jointly and severally liable with such minor for any damages caused by such negligence or willful misconduct, except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section.

The department shall accept the application of a qualified minor if:

(I) A minor under eighteen years of age has deposited, or there is deposited on the minor's behalf, proof of financial responsibility covering the operation of a motor vehicle owned by the minor or, if the minor is not the owner of a motor vehicle, covering the operation of another motor vehicle; and

(II) The application is accompanied by an affidavit of liability signed by one parent or the guardian of the minor unless, under subsection (1) or (1.5) of this section, the minor need not have a responsible adult sign the affidavit of liability.

While proof of financial responsibility is maintained, the parent, foster parent, or guardian is not subject to the liability imposed under subsection (2) of this section. Nothing in this section requires a foster parent to sign an affidavit of liability for a foster child and nothing in this section precludes a foster parent from obtaining a named driver's exclusion on the foster parent's insurance policy.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2119, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

(1.5) added, p. 731, § 10, effective July 1; (3) and (4) amended, p. 1350, § 17, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 392, § 1, effective May 2.

L. 2004:

(1)(a) and IP(1)(b) amended, p. 1266, § 4, effective July 1; (1.5)(b) repealed, p. 1892, § 5, effective August 4.

L. 2005:

(1)(a) amended, p. 642, § 5, effective May 27.

L. 2006:

(1)(a) amended, p. 738, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(1)(a) and (1)(b)(I) amended, (HB 17-1329), ch. 381, p. 1985, § 68, effective June 6.

L. 2018:

(1)(a) and (1)(b)(I) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 453, § 142, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(1)(a), IP(1)(b), (1)(b)(I), (1)(b)(II), and (3) amended, (1)(b)(III) and (1)(b)(IV) repealed, and (1.5)(e) added, (HB 19-1023), ch. 239, p. 2361, § 2, effective August 2.

42-2-109. Release from liability.

Any person who has signed the affidavit of liability which accompanied the application of a minor for a minor driver's license or permit may thereafter file with the department a verified written request that the license of said minor be cancelled. Upon receipt of such request, the department shall cancel the license of said minor, unless the minor has already reached the age of eighteen years, and the person who signed the affidavit of liability for such minor shall be relieved from all liability imposed by section 42-2-108 (2).

When such minor reaches the age of eighteen years, the person who signed the minor's affidavit of liability is relieved of all liability imposed by section 42-2-108 (2).

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2120, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 1351, § 18, effective July 1, 2001.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-108 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-2-109 was relocated to § 42-2-110.

42-2-110. Revocation upon death of signer for minor.

The department, upon receipt of satisfactory evidence of the death of the person who signed the affidavit of liability which accompanied the application for a license of such minor, shall cancel such license, unless the minor has already reached the age of eighteen years, and shall not issue a new license until such time as a new application is made pursuant to the provisions of this article.

In the event of the death of the signer, a licensee under the age of eighteen years shall notify the department and secure the necessary new signer.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2120, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1351, § 19, effective July 1, 2001.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-109 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-2-110 was relocated to § 42-2-111.

42-2-111. Examination of applicants and drivers - when required.

The department shall examine every applicant for a driver's or minor driver's license. The executive director of the department, in the director's discretion, may conduct the examination in any county convenient for the applicant. The examination shall include a test of the applicant's eyesight, his or her ability to read and understand highway signs that regulate, warn, and direct traffic, and his or her knowledge of the traffic laws of this state, an actual demonstration of the applicant's ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable care and control in the operation of a motor vehicle, and such further physical and mental examination as the department finds necessary to determine the applicant's fitness to operate a motor vehicle safely upon the highways; except that an applicant seeking renewal of a driver's license by mail under section 42-2-118 need only submit the information required by that section.

The department, in issuing the drivers' licenses for certain types or general classes of vehicles, may waive any examination required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) for applicants and may certify certain employers, governmental agencies, or other appropriate organizations to train and examine all applicants for such certain types or general classes of licenses, if such training and examination is equal to the training and examination of the department.

Repealed.

If the department has evidence that indicates that a licensed driver or minor driver is incompetent or otherwise not qualified to be licensed, it may, upon written notice of at least ten days to the licensee, require such driver to submit to an examination.

If a fatal motor vehicle accident involving one or more licensed drivers or minor drivers occurs, the department, if deemed appropriate, shall mail a written notice to all such drivers involved in the accident requiring such drivers to submit to examination. If the department has not mailed a written notice to any driver involved in a fatal accident within ninety days after the department receives notice regarding such accident, the department shall not require an examination of such driver based upon such accident.

Upon the conclusion of an examination required under this subsection (3), the department shall take such action as it deems appropriate and may deny, cancel, suspend, or revoke the license of such person or permit that person to retain such license subject to the restrictions under section 42-2-116. Refusal or failure of the licensee to submit to such examination shall be grounds for suspension or revocation of such person's license. Such decision of the department shall be reviewed by a court of record upon appeal to that court by the party aggrieved.

The department shall prepare and print rules, requirements, and regulations for the mandatory use of license examiners, and the same shall be strictly adhered to in the examination of all drivers.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2121, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

(2) repealed, p. 1203, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1)(a) amended, p. 141, § 1, effective March 28; (3) amended, p. 135, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

L. 99:

(1)(a) amended, p. 631, § 47, effective August 4.

L. 2000:

(1)(a), (3)(a), and (3)(b) amended, p. 1343, § 5, effective July 1, 2001.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-110 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-2-111 was relocated to § 42-2-113.

42-2-112. Medical advice - use by department - provider immunity.

In order to determine whether any licensed driver or any applicant for a driver's license is physically or mentally able to operate a motor vehicle safely upon the highways of this state, the department is authorized, pursuant to this section and upon the adoption of rules concerning medical criteria for driver licensing, to seek and receive a written medical opinion from any physician, physician assistant, or optometrist licensed in this state. Such written medical opinion may also be used by the department in regard to the renewal, suspension, revocation, or cancellation of drivers' licenses pursuant to this article. No written medical opinion shall be sought pursuant to this section unless the department has reason to believe that the driver or applicant is physically or mentally unable to operate a motor vehicle safely upon the highways of this state.

In addition to the written medical opinion sought and received pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the department may consider a written medical opinion received from the personal physician, physician assistant, or optometrist of an individual driver or applicant. Any written medical opinion requested by the applicant or driver from a personal physician, physician assistant, or optometrist shall be provided to the department at the expense of the applicant or driver. Any written medical opinion required by the department shall also be at the expense of the applicant or driver.

No civil or criminal action shall be brought against any physician, physician assistant, or optometrist licensed to practice in this state for providing a written medical or optometric opinion pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section if the physician, physician assistant, or optometrist acts in good faith and without malice.

A written medical opinion received by the department which relates to an individual applicant or driver is for the confidential use of the department in making decisions on the individual's qualifications as a driver, and the written medical opinion shall not be divulged to any person, except to the applicant or driver, or used in evidence in any trial or proceeding except in matters concerning the individual's qualifications to receive or retain a driver's license.

Written medical opinions received by the department pursuant to this section, in addition to other sources of information, may be used by the department in the adoption of administrative rules concerning medical criteria for driver licensing.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2122, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 643, § 6, effective May 27.

L. 2016:

(1), (2), and (3) amended, (SB 16-158), ch. 204, p. 731, § 25, effective August 10.

42-2-113. License examiners appointed.

The department may appoint license examiners for any county in this state to conduct local examinations for all types of drivers' licenses. The officers of the department shall conduct the examination as prescribed by law for all drivers in the county and collect the fees as provided in section 42-2-114 and remit the same to the department, which shall transfer the same to the credit of the highway users tax fund; except that, for fiscal years 2012-13 through 2014-15, to the state treasurer, who shall credit the fees to the licensing services cash fund created in section 42-2-114.5.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2122, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1640, § 23, effective June 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-274), ch. 210, p. 951, § 2, effective May 1.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1387), ch. 205, p. 886, § 2, effective May 5.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1216), ch. 80, p. 263, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-111 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-2-113 was relocated to § 42-2-115.